Tennessee, session 114, HB0852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1354(a) is amended by
deleting the language "thirty (30) days" and substituting "sixty (60) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0852
003006
- 1 -